Utah statutes.
10-8-20.   Lighting works -- Contracts -- Retainage.
(1)  They may contract with and authorize any person, company or association
to construct gas works, electric or other lighting works within the city, and
give such persons, company or association the privilege of furnishing light
for the public buildings, streets, sidewalks and alleys of the city for any
length of time not exceeding three years.
(2)  If any payment on a contract with a private person, firm, or corporation
to construct gas works, electric or other lighting works within the city is
retained or withheld, it shall be retained or withheld and released as
provided in Section 13-8-5.
